lexc/noun/enhuho.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§  §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§  §AE1§ §k§
§VV§   §ooez13§ §EOA2§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez11§ §oeoez15§ §OEOE14§ §OEOE3§
§ooez23§ §EOA12§ §oeoez13§ §Jnull§ §oeoez4§ §oeoez31§ §oeoez25§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

!hó, tó, fű, mű,  cső, kő, falu - mind oe-s is (művet, követ, csövet, füvet)
! borjú
! cső
! daru
! falu
! fattyú
! fű
! gyapjú
! hamu
! hó
! kő
! mag
! mű
! nyű
! odú
! szó
! tetű
! tó
! tő
! varjú

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA12§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez13§t       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE14§m   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE14§d   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam1;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE14§t§OEOE3§k   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§Jnull§§AE§im   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§Jnull§§AE§id   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§Jnull§§AE§i   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§Jnull§§AE§ink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§Jnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§Jnull§§AE§ik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Gen1;

LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez15§k    Gen1;
! has no esc, required

LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1;               
                       Case1;
 
LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounko
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurko;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famko;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possko;

LEXICON Possko
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famko;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famko;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famko;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famko;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famko;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famko;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famko;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famko;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famko;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famko;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famko;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famko;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famko;

LEXICON Plurko
+Plur:^+cPlur^k    #;  !fűk
        
LEXICON Famko
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genko;
                       Genko;

LEXICON Genko
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseko;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseko;
                       Caseko;
 
LEXICON Caseko
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounmelyko
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possmely;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fammelyko;

LEXICON Fammelyko
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmelyko;
                       Genmelyko;
LEXICON Genmelyko
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemelyko;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemelyko;
                       Casemelyko;

LEXICON Noun
Bajkál-tó AddNounmelyko;
Erie-tó AddNounmelyko;
Huron-tó AddNounmelyko;
Kajántó AddNounmelyko;
Ladoga-tó AddNounmelyko;
Ontario-tó AddNounmelyko;
Petrahó AddNounmelyko;
Verestó AddNounmelyko;
acélnyű:acélnyüv AddNoun1;
aggófű AddNounko;
ajtómű AddNoun;
alapfutómű:alapfutóműv AddNoun1;
aranycső AddNounko;
aranyfű:aranyfüv AddNoun1;
aranyszínmű AddNoun;
aranytó AddNounmelyko;
bambuszfű:bambuszfüv AddNoun1;
bazaltkő AddNounko;
betonerőmű AddNoun;
betonmű:betonműv AddNoun1;
bodzafacső AddNounko;
bolható AddNounmelyko;
boltozatkő:boltozatköv AddNoun1;
bronzdombormű AddNoun;
burgonyatő:burgonyatöv AddNoun1;
burkolatkő AddNounko;
bélelőcső:bélelőcsöv AddNoun1;
bíborpajzstetű AddNoun;
búvártó AddNounmelyko;
búzafű AddNounko;
csatornamű AddNoun;
cseregépjármű:cseregépjárműv AddNoun1;
csillagfű AddNounko;
csonthó AddNounmelyko;
csoporthajtómű AddNoun;
céltávcső AddNounko;
címmű:címműv AddNoun1;
daruhajtómű AddNoun;
dudvafű AddNounko;
díszmű AddNoun;
dúsítócső:dúsítócsöv AddNoun1;
elhatárolókő AddNounko;
elővédőmű AddNoun;
ezüstfű:ezüstfüv AddNoun1;
falufűtőmű AddNoun;
falábtó AddNounmelyko;
farkasfű AddNounko;
festőfű AddNounko;
feszítőmű AddNoun;
fillérfű:fillérfüv AddNoun1;
forrásmű AddNoun;
félkő AddNounko;
fémmű AddNoun;
fércmű:fércműv AddNoun1;
függőtó AddNounmelyko;
főmű AddNoun;
gabonafű AddNounko;
gránitsírkő:gránitsírköv AddNoun1;
gumitó AddNounmelyko;
gyermekjármű AddNoun;
gyémántkő AddNounko;
gépjármű AddNoun;
gépzongoramű:gépzongoraműv AddNoun1;
görbecseppkő AddNounko;
haltó AddNounmelyko;
hangmű AddNoun;
hegytó AddNounmelyko;
hengercső AddNounko;
herbafű:herbafüv AddNoun1;
hirdetőjármű AddNoun;
háztő AddNoun;
hévíztó AddNounmelyko;
hídkő AddNounko;
húzójármű:húzójárműv AddNoun1;
hűtőtó AddNounmelyko;
ikerhajtómű AddNoun;
injektálócső AddNounko;
izzócső:izzócsöv AddNoun1;
járdatő AddNoun;
játszókő AddNounko;
kacsató AddNounmelyko;
karmű AddNoun;
kartoncső:kartoncsöv AddNoun1;
kaszakő AddNounko;
kezdőtávcső AddNounko;
kikötővédőmű AddNoun;
kipuffogócső:kipuffogócsöv AddNoun1;
koleszterinkő AddNounko;
kormű AddNoun;
korpahó AddNounmelyko;
kukoricacső:kukoricacsöv AddNoun1;
kulcscső AddNounko;
kénkő AddNounko;
kéntó AddNounmelyko;
kísérőjármű AddNoun;
könyvtárkő:könyvtárköv AddNoun1;
kőcső AddNounko;
kődombormű AddNoun;
latyaktó AddNounmelyko;
levéltő:levéltöv AddNoun1;
lomkő AddNounko;
lucfenyőtetű AddNoun;
láptó AddNounmelyko;
lézerkő AddNounko;
macskamentafű:macskamentafüv AddNoun1;
medúzafű AddNounko;
meggymű AddNoun;
metántó AddNounmelyko;
mirigycső:mirigycsöv AddNoun1;
morénakő AddNounko;
morénató AddNounmelyko;
mozdonyhajtómű AddNoun;
mérőjármű AddNoun;
műhó AddNounmelyko;
műtufakő AddNounko;
műtufakő:műtufaköv AddNoun1;
nyitótő AddNoun;
nyálkacső AddNounko;
nádtó AddNounmelyko;
növénytetű:növénytetv AddNoun1;
orrtő	AddNounko;
pakuraerőmű AddNoun;
papsajtfű:papsajtfüv AddNoun1;
paptó AddNounmelyko;
pattintókő AddNounko;
piató AddNounmelyko;
polietiléncső AddNounko;
pontytó AddNounmelyko;
porcsinkeserűfű:porcsinkeserűfüv AddNoun1;
pápafű AddNounko;
párolómű AddNoun;
raktározócső:raktározócsöv AddNoun1;
rézmű AddNoun;
rézsűkő:rézsűköv AddNoun1;
rókató AddNounmelyko;
rúnakő AddNounko;
stroboszkóp-villanócső:stroboszkóp-villanócsöv AddNoun1;
szabadságemlékmű AddNoun;
szelvénykő AddNounko;
szerkő:szerköv AddNoun1;
szélerőmű AddNoun;
szériafutómű:szériafutóműv AddNoun1;
szótő	AddNounko;
szökőhó AddNounmelyko;
sásostó AddNounmelyko;
sótó AddNounmelyko;
sörmű AddNoun;
sütőkő:sütőköv AddNoun1;
tengericső AddNounko;
tigrisfű:tigrisfüv AddNoun1;
toronytó AddNounmelyko;
traktorhajtómű AddNoun;
tárolótó AddNounmelyko;
társmű:társműv AddNoun1;
töltőtó AddNounmelyko;
tömlőcső AddNounko;
történészéletmű AddNoun;
tűztó AddNounmelyko;
ufóhajtómű:ufóhajtóműv AddNoun1;
velenceitó AddNounmelyko;
vezetékkő AddNounko;
vezérlőjármű:vezérlőjárműv AddNoun1;
vezérlőmű AddNoun;
végtó AddNounmelyko;
vértetű AddNoun;
vértetű:vértetv AddNoun1;
zsályafű AddNounko;
Árpástó AddNounmelyko;
Írottkő:Írottköv AddNoun1;
átlagmű AddNoun;
ónixkő:ónixköv AddNoun1;
öblítőcső AddNounko;
öntözőtó AddNounmelyko;
őrlőmű AddNoun;
űrkő:űrköv AddNoun1;
